Texas, session 892, HB148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 39.023, Education Code, is amended by adding Subsection (s) to read as follows: (s)  The agency shall prohibit the use of artificial intelligence to score a constructed response on an assessment instrument administered under this section or an assessment system developed under Section 39.027(e). SECTION 2.  This Act applies beginning with the 2026-2027 school year. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.